Illinois, session 104th, HB533.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The State Treasurer's Bank Services Trust Fund 5Act is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 212/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the State 8Treasurer's Bank Services Trust Fund Act.9(Source: P.A. 87-1035.)